apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="mur/a__np">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="pariz__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="trst__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="zalog__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tanger__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ju</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ju</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jem</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bled__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="komintern/a__np">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
		
    <pardef n="trbov/lje__np">
      <e>       <p><l>lje</l>       <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>elj</l>       <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ljam</l>      <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lje</l>       <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ljah</l>      <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ljami</l>     <r>lje<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jugoslavij/a__np">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="andrej__np_s">
      <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>      <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="berlin__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>      <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="Slovenija">       <i>Slovenij</i><par n="jugoslavij/a__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Srbija">          <i>Srbij</i><par n="jugoslavij/a__np"/></e>
